Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.150

Public stadium authority—Liability insurance.

The board of directors of the public stadium authority may purchase liability insurance with such limits as the directors may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting and holding personally harmless authority officers and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1997 c 220 s 114 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]